California, session 20252026, AB593.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 18901.59 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:18901.59. (a) The department may identify data-sharing opportunities with other state and local public entities, and any other unit of state government, for the purposes of improving the administration of CalFresh, increasing CalFresh participation, measuring the impact of CalFresh, and increasing access to critical public health and poverty-alleviating services and other services and benefits available to low-income individuals.(b) The department shall designate an executive-level employee of the department who shall report to the Director of Social Services on the implementation of the provisions of this section and Section 18901.58.